District of Columbia statutes.
47-816

Submission on exempt property.

At the time the Mayor submits to the Council the estimated assessment roll under § 47-815, he shall also submit the following:

(1)

The total aggregate assessed value of real property exempt from the real property tax levied in the District for the current fiscal year by major class or type of exempt status and the tax that would have been paid during such fiscal year had such property not been exempt; and

(2)

The estimated total aggregate assessed value of real property exempt from the real property tax levied in the District by major class or type of exempt status and the tax that would be paid during the fiscal year under the real property tax rate or rates proposed by the Mayor pursuant to § 47-815.

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1053, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 414
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-70, title III, § 305, 23 DCR 540
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 502(j), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-816.
1973 Ed., § 47-634.
D.C. Law 13-305 substituted “estimated assessment roll” for “proposed real property tax rate or rates”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see 2(j) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).